Utah statutes.
78B-6-605.   Penalties for wrongful acts of defendant.

(1)  A defendant, officer, or other person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and liable to the injured party in an amount not to exceed $5,000 if:

(a)  the defendant attempts to evade the service of the writ of habeas corpus; or

(b)  an officer or other person willfully fails to comply with the legal duties imposed upon him or disobeys an order to release a person in custody.

(2)  Any person knowingly aiding in or abetting invalidation of this section is subject to the same punishment and forfeiture.



Enacted by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

